Nebraska, session 109, LB1055.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 28-348, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
28-348 Sections 28-348 to 28-387 and sections 3 and 4 of this act shall be
known and may be cited as the Adult Protective Services Act.
Sec. 2. Section 28-350, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
28-350 For purposes of the Adult Protective Services Act, unless the
context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 28-351 to 28-371
and section 3 of this act shall be used.
Sec. 3. Adult protective services official means an individual who is
employed by the department and who develops and implements adult protective
services.
Sec. 4. (1) The department shall require each adult protective services
official to successfully complete training relating to caring for individuals
with Alzheimer's disease and other dementia. Such training shall be no less
than one hour in length. An adult protective services official employed by the
department on the effective date of this act shall complete the training within
thirty days of such date.
(2) The training required by subsection (1) of this section shall include,
but not be limited to: (a) Psychiatric and behavioral symptoms of Alzheimer's
disease and other dementia; (b) methods of communicating respectfully and
effectively with individuals with Alzheimer's disease and other dementia; (c)
techniques for understanding and approaching behavioral symptoms; (d)
information relating to safety including, but not limited to, wandering; (e)
alerting law enforcement agencies to potential criminal behavior by a family
member, a caretaker, or an institution; (f) alerting law enforcement agencies
to neglect or exploitation; (g) the most common types of abuse; (h) methods of
identifying incidents of self-neglect; (i) methods of identifying neglect by a
caregiver; and (j) protocols for referral of such individuals to local care
resources and professionals who are skilled in Alzheimer's disease and other
dementia care to encourage cross-referral and for reporting abuse.
(3) The department may collaborate with a private nonprofit organization
with expertise in working with individuals with Alzheimer's disease and other
dementia to provide the training required by subsection (1) of this section.
(4) Each adult protective services official shall complete the training
once every five years.
Sec. 5. Original sections 28-348 and 28-350, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, are repealed.
-1-